Washington statutes.
RCW 12.36.090

Judgment against appellant and sureties.

In all cases of appeal to the superior court under this chapter, if the judgment is against the appellant, in whole or in part, such judgment shall be rendered against the appellant and his or her sureties on the bond on appeal.

[ 1997 c 352 s 13; 1929 c 58 s 8; RRS s 1918. Prior: Code 1881 s 1867; 1873 p 369 s 166; 1854 p 253 s 170.]